Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 6 Public Defender

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Post Conviction Relief: Do It Once, Do It Right and Be Done With It,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 473 (1989).

§ 7-6-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Defender Act”.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.17; W.S. 1977, §

7-1-107

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 176, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-6-102(a)(vi).

Cited

in

Schepp v. Fremont County, 685 F. Supp. 1200, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4206 (D. Wyo. 1988); Page v. State, 949 P.2d 466,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 7-6-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 121, § 2.

“Expenses”, when used with reference to representation under this act, include the expenses of investigation, other preparation and trial;

“Needy person” means a person who at the time of his need of an attorney is unable to provide for the full payment of an attorney and all other necessary expenses of representation without prejudicing his financial ability to provide basic economic necessities for himself or his family considering the person’s available funds and the anticipated cost of the attorney.

“Serious crime” means:

Any felony or misdemeanor under the laws of the state of Wyoming for which incarceration as a punishment is a practical possibility, provided, however, that counsel need not be appointed for a misdemeanor if the judge, at the initial appearance, determines and states on the record that he will not sentence the defendant to any period of imprisonment if the defendant is convicted of the misdemeanor; and

Any misdemeanor offense charged under W.S.

6-2-501

,

6-2-510

or

6-2-511

, or any other provision, a conviction of which is a “misdemeanor crime of domestic violence” as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(33), and which may therefore result in the disqualification of the person to possess firearms pursuant to the provisions of 18 U.S.C. §§ 922(g)(9) and 924(a)(2), regardless of the determination of the judge that he intends not to impose a term of incarceration for the state offense.

“This act” means W.S.

7-6-101

through

7-6-114

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.18; W.S. 1977, §

7-1-108

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1989, ch. 121, § 2; 1999, ch. 95, § 1; 2009, ch. 19, § 2; 2014 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 34, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to crimes and offenses, see title 6.

The 2009 amendment,

added (B) in (a)(v) and made related changes.

Laws 2009, ch. 19, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2009.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “6-2-510 or

6-2-511

” in (a)(v)(B).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iv) substituted “at the time of his need of an attorney is unable” for “at the time his need is determined is unable,” and added “representation without prejudicing his financial ability to provide basic economic necessities for himself or his family considering the person’s available funds and the anticipated cost of the attorney” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Court declines to follow U.S. Supreme Court. —

The court declined to follow the United States Supreme Court's actual incarceration approach to determine the right to counsel, and declined the holding that an uncounseled conviction can be used to enhance a subsequent offense. Brisson v. State, 955 P.2d 888,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1998).

Court inquiry. —

Proper inquiries were not made to determine whether defendant wanted to be represented by appointed counsel; rather the court merely queried whether defendant intended to represent himself, hire an attorney, or ask the court to consider appointment of a public defender, and when defendant said he made about $1,000 a month, the court ordered that he sign a waiver of his right to assistance of counsel. Wilkie v. State, 2002 WY 164, 56 P.3d 1023,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2002).

Violation of city ordinance is not “serious crime”

within the definition of the Public Defender Act. State ex rel. Hoke v. Owens, 733 P.2d 240,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

Alberts v. State, 745 P.2d 898,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 539

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Long v. State, 745 P.2d 547,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1987); Juarez v. State, 791 P.2d 287,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1990).

Stated

in

Jackson v. State, 624 P.2d 751,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 7-6-103.
Creation of office of state public defender; appointment of state public defender and assistants; duties; removal.

There is created the office of the state public defender. The office of the state public defender shall be deemed a state agency for budgeting purposes pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1001

.1 through

9-2-1014

.2.

The state public defender shall be appointed by and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

The state public defender shall:

Be a member in good standing of the Wyoming state bar;

Have had experience in defense or prosecution of persons accused of crime in this state;

Be compensated as determined by the Wyoming personnel division;

Devote full time to the performance of his duties;

Administer the public defender program of the state;

Promulgate rules and regulations establishing a standard fee schedule for services provided by attorneys appointed pursuant to W.S.

7-6-109

and post the schedule on the agency’s website;

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 87, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 3.

The state public defender shall not engage in private practice except to complete business pending at the time of his appointment.

Any assistant public defender may serve in another judicial district on a case by case basis at the request of the state public defender.

The governor may appoint full or part-time assistant public defenders in each judicial district with the advice of the state public defender, the district judge of the district and the boards of county commissioners in the district. In appointing assistant public defenders the governor shall consider the recommendations submitted to him, the demand for legal services, the criminal case load statistics, the population, the geographical characteristics and any other relevant factors.

Each assistant public defender shall:

Serve at the pleasure of the state public defender;

Be a member in good standing of the Wyoming state bar. The governor may remove any assistant public defender as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

;

Be compensated as determined by the Wyoming personnel division, or by the state public defender if appointed under a purchase order contract; and

Devote full time to the performance of his duties when directed by the state public defender.

A full time assistant public defender shall not engage in private practice except to complete business pending at the time of his appointment.

The state public defender may act as his own attorney or may be represented by the attorney general in any actions, suits or claims in which the office of the state public defender or the state public defender himself is a party.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any attorney providing services for the office of the state public defender in the defense of a criminal case shall, for matters arising out of such services, be considered a state employee for purposes of coverage and representation under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, and the state self-insurance program, W.S.

1-41-101

through

1-41-111

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.19; W.S. 1977, §

7-1-109

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 175, § 1; ch. 176, § 1; 1989, ch. 121, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3; 2013 ch. 87, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 122, § 3, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to personnel division, see §

9-2-1019

.

As to Wyoming state bar, see Rules Providing for Organization and Government of the Bar Association, see

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “1-39-121” for “1-39-120” in (k); and made a stylistic change.

The 2012 amendment,

added (c)(viii) and made related change.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “and post the schedule on the agency’s website” following “ W.S.

7-6-109

” in (c)(vi) and repealed (c)(vii) which read: “On or before June 8, 1989, promulgate rules and regulations in cooperation with the supreme court of Wyoming establishing standards for determining who is a needy person as defined
W.S. 7-6-102(a)(iv). The standards shall require the person to file with the court a written affidavit under oath stating his financial assets and liabilities;”.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the middle of (k), substituted “1-39-120”
for “1-39-121.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (c)(viii), which read “Administer the guardian ad litem program as provided in W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

.”

The 2021 amendment

, in (a), substituted "9-2-1001.1" for "9-2-1001" and "9-2-1014.2" for "9-2-1026."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Applied

in

Wilkie v. State, 2002 WY 164, 56 P.3d 1023,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Juarez v. State, 791 P.2d 287,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of statutes providing for office of public defender, 36 ALR3d 1403.

Right of public defenders to join collective bargaining unit, 108 ALR5th 241.

§ 7-6-104.
Representation of needy persons.

The public defender shall represent as counsel any needy person who is under arrest for or formally charged with having committed a serious crime if:

The defendant requests counsel; or

The court, on its own motion or otherwise, orders appointment of counsel and the defendant does not affirmatively waive or reject, on the record, the opportunity to be represented by legal counsel in the proceeding.

Appointed counsel, services and facilities necessary for representation, and court costs shall be provided at public expense to the extent that the person, at the time the court determines need, is unable to provide for their payment.

A needy person who is entitled to be represented by an attorney under subsection (a) of this section is entitled:

To be represented by the public defender in a proceeding for revocation of probation when it is determined by the court to be statutorily or constitutionally required;

To be represented in any appeal to a Wyoming court, and in cases in which the death penalty has been imposed or in such other cases as the state public defender deems appropriate, in a writ of certiorari to the United States supreme court, and in proceedings under W.S.

7-14-101

through

7-14-108

;

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 121, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 95, § 2.

To be represented by the public defender when requested by a fugitive in a proceeding for extradition for the limited purpose provided in W.S.

7-3-210

or for fugitive juveniles under the Interstate Compact on Juveniles, W.S.

14-6-102

, when requested by the juvenile or the court;

To be represented by counsel at every stage of the proceedings, from the time of the initial appointment by the court until the entry of final judgment, at which time the representation shall end, unless the court appoints counsel for purposes of appeal, correction or modification of sentence;

To be represented by the public defender in a motion brought in accordance with the provisions of the Post–Conviction DNA Testing Act or in accordance with W.S.

7-12-405

.

A needy person’s right to a benefit under subsection (a) or (c) of this section is not affected by his having provided a similar benefit at his own expense, or by his having waived it, at an earlier stage.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.20; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-110; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1; 1989, ch. 121, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 95, § 1; 1999, ch. 95, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 92, § 2; 2013 ch. 170, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2018 ch. 77, § 2, effective March 12, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to right of minor to counsel, see §

7-1-105

.

As to right to counsel of person subject to extradition, see §

7-3-210

.

As to constitutional right of accused to defend in person and by counsel, see art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to right to counsel at preliminary examinations, see Rule 5.1, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (c)(vii).

The 2013 amendment,

added the language beginning “or for fugitive juveniles” to the end of (c)(v).

Laws 2013, ch. 170, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2018 amendment,

in (c)(vii), added “or in accordance with W.S.

7-12-405

” at the end.

Laws 2018, ch. 77, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

Court declines to follow U.S. Supreme Court. —

The court declined to follow the United States Supreme Court's actual incarceration approach to determine the right to counsel, and declined the holding that an uncounseled conviction can be used to enhance a subsequent offense. Brisson v. State, 955 P.2d 888,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1998).

Construction.—

The right to representation described in this section attaches when the qualifying defendant indicates one way or the other that he wants an attorney; the right is not dependent on a court appointment, and the reference to the court’s appointment serves only to aid in determining whether the defendant has invoked the right to counsel. As interpreted, there is no conflict between this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-6-105(b). Lozano v. Circuit Court of the Sixth Judicial Dist., 2020 WY 44, 460 P.3d 721,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2020).

Attorney required to investigate options for indigent client. —

If trial counsel actually knew or had reason to believe his client was indigent, it is deficient performance not to investigate the options available to the client under this section. An attorney is presumed to know the applicable law. McCoy v. State, 886 P.2d 252,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. Dec. 20, 1994).

Plea of not guilty without representation allowed. —

In a prosecution for murder, no right of defendant was prejudiced by taking his plea of not guilty at time of arraignment when he was not represented by counsel. James v. State, 27 Wyo. 378, 196 P. 1045,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1921).

Absence of counsel when instruction given not necessarily prejudicial. —

Where the state waived any objections to the failure of counsel to object to a supplemental instruction, either before or immediately after it was given, and the trial judge was given an opportunity to rule on the propriety of his instruction, brought to his attention before appeal to the supreme court, so the question was properly raised on appeal, defendant was not prejudiced by the absence of counsel, even if true that defendant was unrepresented at the time the instruction was given to the jury. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

No requirement for appointment of appellate counsel. —

Defendant was not denied meaningful access to the law and the courts by an appellate court's denial of a motion for the appointment of appellate counsel; under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-6-104(c)(vi), there was no statutory requirement for appointment of counsel at every posttrial motion.
Eckdahl v. State, 2011 WY 152, 264 P.3d 22,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2011).

District court properly rejected defendant's motion to have counsel appointed for him in his appeal of the denial of his motions to correct an illegal sentence because an appeal of the denial of a motion to correct an illegal sentence was not a critical stage, and defendant not have the right to be represented by appointed counsel in his appeal; because there was no requirement to appoint counsel, the decision was made at the discretion of the district court.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Payment of expenses may be compelled. —

Section 7-6-106(c) authorizes a court order to compel payment by the defendant of such amount as he is able to provide for necessary expenses of representation after determination of need, as provided in subsection (b) of this section and § 7-6-106(a). Phillips v. State, 553 P.2d 1037,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1976).

Court may not impose anticipatory requirement for periodic payments. —

This section provides for the representation of a needy person on appeal, but imposing an anticipatory requirement for periodic payments is not consistent with the statutory language. Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995).

Revocation of probation. —

Although Rule 44(a)(2), W.R.Cr.P., limits the circumstances under which the court is required to appoint counsel in a probation revocation proceeding, a defendant is constitutionally entitled to court-appointed counsel in the specific circumstance when the proceeding includes sentencing. Nelson v. State, 934 P.2d 1238,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1997).

Under Wyoming's judicial revocation procedure where the state is represented by a prosecutor and the rules of evidence apply to a portion of the proceedings, the Sixth Amendment requires appointment of counsel for indigent probationers when the indigent probationer is entitled to be represented by an attorney under subsection (a). An inescapable corollary to such a holding is the invalidation of W.R.Cr.P. 44(a)(2), in the context of judicial revocations. Pearl v. State, 996 P.2d 688,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2000).

Post-conviction standard. —

The standard for determining the proceeding “is not a proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means would be willing to bring at his own expense” is entirely subjective and results in unbridled discretion. Long v. State, 745 P.2d 547,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1987) (decided prior to 1989 amendment).

The legislature should settle for the test of indigence for post-conviction proceedings and permit counsel to pursue all potential avenues of relief for a convicted indigent. Long v. State, 745 P.2d 547,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1987) (decided prior to 1989 amendment).

This section, which provides that the court must also determine that the proceeding is one which a reasonable person with adequate means would be willing to bring at his own expense, does not prevail over §

7-14-104

as relating to the representation by counsel at the post-conviction relief stage. Therefore, a petitioner for post-conviction relief who is without means for procuring counsel is entitled to have court-appointed counsel represent him commencing with the preparation of the petition. Alberts v. State, 745 P.2d 898,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 539

(Wyo. 1987) (decided prior to 1989 amendment).

Court properly denied defendants' motions for appointment of counsel in their motions to correct illegal sentences, because a motion to correct an illegal sentence was not a critical stage of criminal proceedings, and although defendants made uncorroborated claims about the deficiencies in the legal resources available to them in prison, they did not establish the actual injury required to demonstrate a violation of their constitutional right to access to courts.
Gould v. State, 2006 WY 157, 151 P.3d 261,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 2006), cert. denied, 552 U.S. 854, 128 S. Ct. 125, 169 L. Ed. 2d 88, 2007 U.S. LEXIS 9472 (U.S. 2007).

Applied

in

Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987); Aden v. State, 761 P.2d 88,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1988); Wilkie v. State, 2002 WY 164, 56 P.3d 1023,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Jackson v. State, 624 P.2d 751,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Bibbins v. State, 741 P.2d 115,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1987); Jones v. State, 771 P.2d 368,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1989); Van Riper v. State, 882 P.2d 230,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1994); Keats v. State, 2005 WY 81, 115 P.3d 1110,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty to advise accused of right to assistance of counsel, 3 ALR2d 1003.

Absence of counsel for accused at time of sentence as requiring vacation thereof or other relief, 20 ALR2d 1240.

Indigent defendant's right to aid of state as regards new trial or appeal, 55 ALR2d 1072.

Constitutionally protected right of indigent accused to appointment of counsel in state court prosecution, 93 ALR2d 747.

Accused's right to assistance of counsel at or prior to arraignment, 5 ALR3d 1269.

Conflict of interest between or among codefendants precluding representation by same counsel, 34 ALR3d 470.

Right to assistance of counsel at proceedings to revoke probation, 44 ALR3d 306.

Determination of indigency entitling accused to appointment of counsel, 51 ALR3d 1108.

Right to counsel in contempt proceedings, 52 ALR3d 1002.

Right of indigent to choose counsel to be appointed to assist him, 66 ALR3d 996.

Modern status of rules and standards in state courts as to adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client, 2 ALR4th 27.

Right of accused in criminal prosecution to presence of counsel at court-appointed or -approved psychiatric examination, 3 ALR4th 910.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding argument, 6 ALR4th 16.

Propriety of using otherwise inadmissible statement, taken in violation of Miranda rule, to impeach criminal defendant's credibility — state cases, 14 ALR4th 676.

Denial of, or interference with, accused's right to have attorney initially contact accused, 18 ALR4th 669.

Denial of accused's request for initial contact with attorney — cases involving offenses other than drunk driving, 18 ALR4th 743.

Relief available for violation of right to counsel at sentencing in state criminal trial, 65 ALR4th 183.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: misrepresentation, or failure to advise, of immigration consequences of guilty plea — state cases, 65 ALR4th 719.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of fingerprint expert, 72 ALR4th 874.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of expert in social attitudes, 74 ALR4th 330.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of chemist, toxicologist, technician, narcotics expert or similar nonmedical specialist in substance analysis, 74 ALR4th 388.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of investigators, 81 ALR4th 259.

Right to appointment of counsel in contempt proceedings, 32 ALR5th 31.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal prosecution to ex parte in camera hearing on request for state-funded expert witness, 83 ALR5th 541.

Appealability of federal court order denying motion for appointment of counsel for indigent party, 67 ALR Fed 925.

What constitutes assertion of right to counsel following Miranda warnings — federal cases, 80 ALR Fed 622.

§ 7-6-105.
Advisement of rights; appointment of attorney.

A needy person who is being interrogated by law enforcement personnel for a serious crime, or who is a probationer or parolee, shall be informed of his right to be represented by an attorney at public expense. If the person being interrogated does not have an attorney and wishes to have the services of an attorney, he shall be provided the opportunity to contact the nearest public defender.

At the person’s initial appearance the court shall advise any defendant who is a needy person of his right to be represented by an attorney at public expense. The court shall further explain to the needy person the possibility that he may be ordered to reimburse the state for the costs associated with his legal representation. If the person charged does not have an attorney and wishes one, the court shall notify an available public defender for the judicial district or shall appoint an attorney to represent the needy person if no public defender is available.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-9.21; W.S. 1977, § 7-1-111; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; ch. 176, § 1.

Unavailability.—

Because this section contemplates that the determination of availability may be made before or simultaneously with the court’s notification, the Supreme Court of Wyoming cannot read it to mandate that a determination of unavailability may occur only through the filing of a motion to withdraw. Lozano v. Circuit Court of the Sixth Judicial Dist., 2020 WY 44, 460 P.3d 721,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2020).

Neither this section nor any other provision of the Public Defender Act dictates a procedure for determining a public defender’s availability at the initial appearance stage of the proceedings. Given this lack of a required procedure, and the fact that this section directs the court to notify an available public defender, the Supreme Court of Wyoming reads this section to contemplate that it is the public defender who will make the determination of its availability before representation is undertaken. Lozano v. Circuit Court of the Sixth Judicial Dist., 2020 WY 44, 460 P.3d 721,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2020).

Interrogated needy person's right to counsel. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-6-105(a) is not applicable unless a defendant is a “needy person” who is “being interrogated”; the resolution of claims under § 7-6-105(a) can require a determination as to whether the defendant is “being interrogated” at the time that he insists § 7-6-105(a) should have been invoked. Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 47, 70 P.3d 179,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. May 20, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 970, 124 S. Ct. 438, 157 L. Ed. 2d 317, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 7776 (U.S. 2003).

When representation of needy person begins. —

The representation of a needy person does not occur until there is some acknowledgment by counsel of the appointment, although that acknowledgment may be a failure to assess a conflict of interest and ask for a removal in a prompt fashion after learning of the appointment. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Where defendant's right to counsel had been waived,

his argument based on this section, that he was not provided with counsel before making his confessions and statements, was not viable; and admission of his statements and confessions was not error. Raigosa v. State, 562 P.2d 1009,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1977).

Bradshaw voluntariness test satisfied. —

Defendant's statement to investigators satisfied the Bradshaw voluntariness test and was properly not suppressed; he was informed of his rights, and, after requesting counsel, he initiated a conversation with investigators in which he made incriminating statements, and, by doing so, he waived his rights to silence and representation. Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 47, 70 P.3d 179,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. May 20, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 970, 124 S. Ct. 438, 157 L. Ed. 2d 317, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 7776 (U.S. 2003).

Quoted

in

Wilkie v. State, 2002 WY 164, 56 P.3d 1023,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Cherniwchan v. State, 594 P.2d 464,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1979); Mapp v. State, 953 P.2d 140,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1998); Trujillo v. State, 2 P.3d 567,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2000).

Construction.—

Trial court erred in ruling that the public defender had to accept all appointments to serve as counsel for indigent defendants unless and until the appointing court ruled otherwise, and therefore its order holding the state public defender in contempt for declining two appointments based on the unavailability of counsel was reversed, because this section afforded the public defender discretion to decline an appointment or appointments. The court further held that in exercising that discretion, there was no requirement, statutory or otherwise, that the public defender show an individualized injury in fact or meet the Strickland post-conviction showing of prejudice. Lozano v. Circuit Court of the Sixth Judicial Dist., 2020 WY 44, 460 P.3d 721,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2020).

The right to representation described in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-6-104(a) attaches when the qualifying defendant indicates one way or the other that he wants an attorney; the right is not dependent on a court appointment, and the reference to the court’s appointment serves only to aid in determining whether the defendant has invoked the right to counsel. As interpreted, there is no conflict between § 104 and this section. Lozano v. Circuit Court of the Sixth Judicial Dist., 2020 WY 44, 460 P.3d 721,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2020).